District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.15

Manner of voting.

(a)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, voting by a proxy at a members meeting shall be prohibited. This subsection shall not prohibit delegate voting based on district or class.

(b)

If voting by a proxy is permitted, a patron member shall appoint only another patron member as a proxy and, if investor members are permitted, an investor member shall appoint only another investor member as a proxy.

(c)

The organic rules may provide for the manner of, and provisions governing, the appointment of a proxy.

(d)

The organic rules may provide for voting on any question by ballot delivered by mail or voting by other means on questions that are subject to vote by members.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 515 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Editor's Notes